Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
In General

§ 81-18-1.
Short title [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

This chapter shall be known and cited as the “Mississippi S.A.F.E. Mortgage Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-3.
Definitions [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Application” means the submission of a borrower’s financial information in anticipation of a credit decision, whether written or computer-generated. If the submission does not state or identify a specific property, the submission is an application for a prequalification and not an application for a federally related mortgage loan. The subsequent addition of an identified property to the submission converts the submission to an application for a federally related mortgage loan.

“Borrower” means a person who submits an application for a residential mortgage loan.

“Branch” means a location of a company in or outside of the state that conducts business as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender. A location shall be considered a branch regarding mortgage broker or mortgage lender activities in any of the following:

If the location is used on any type of advertisement;

If any type of record, loan file or application of the company is located at the location, with the exception of unstaffed storage facilities; or

If the activities of a mortgage loan originator occur at the location.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Banking and Consumer Finance.

“Commitment” means a statement by a lender required to be licensed under this chapter that sets forth the terms and conditions upon which the lender is willing to make a particular mortgage loan to a particular borrower.

“Company” means a licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender under this chapter.

“Control” means the direct or indirect possession of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise, and shall include “controlling,” “controlled by,” and “under common control with.”

“Department” means the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance of the State of Mississippi.

“Depository institution” has the same meaning as in Section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, and includes any credit union.

“Executive officer” means the chief executive officer, the president, the principal financial officer, the principal operating officer, each vice president with responsibility involving policy-making functions for a significant aspect of a person’s business, the secretary, the treasurer, or any other person performing similar managerial or supervisory functions with respect to any organization whether incorporated or unincorporated.

“Federal banking agencies” means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Comptroller of the Currency, the Director of the Office of Thrift Supervision, the National Credit Union Administration, and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

“Housing finance agency” means any authority that is chartered by a state to help meet the affordable housing needs of the residents of the state, is supervised directly or indirectly by the state government, is subject to audit and review by the state in which it operates, and whose activities make it eligible to be a member of the National Council of State Housing Agencies.

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent or grandchild. This term includes stepparents, stepchildren, stepsiblings and adoptive relationships.

“Individual” means a “natural person.”

“License” means a license to act as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender issued by the department under this chapter.

“Licensee” means a person who is required to be licensed as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender under this chapter.

“Loan processor or underwriter” means an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the supervision and instruction of a person licensed or exempt from licensing under this chapter.

For the purposes of this paragraph (q), the term “clerical or support duties” may include, after the receipt of an application:

The receipt, collection, distribution and analysis of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan; and

Communicating with a consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a loan, to the extent that the communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms, or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms.

An individual engaging solely in loan processor or underwriter activities, shall not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists or other promotional items, that the individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator.

“Lock-in agreement” means a written agreement stating the terms of the lock-in fee.

“Lock-in fee” means a fee collected by a licensee to be paid to a lender to guarantee an interest rate or a certain number of points on a mortgage loan from the lender.

“Make a mortgage loan” means to advance funds, offer to advance funds or make a commitment to advance funds to a borrower.

“Misrepresent” means to make a false statement of a substantive fact or to engage in, with intent to deceive or mislead, any conduct that leads to a false belief that is material to the transaction.

“Mortgage broker” means any person who directly or indirectly or by electronic activity solicits, places or negotiates residential mortgage loans for others, or offers to solicit, place or negotiate residential mortgage loans for others that does not close residential mortgage loans in the company name, does not use its own funds, or who closes residential mortgage loans in the name of the company, and sells, assigns or transfers the loan to others within forty-eight (48) hours of the closing.

“Mortgage lender” means any person who directly or indirectly or by electronic activity originates, makes, funds or purchases or offers to originate, make, or fund or purchase a residential mortgage loan or who services residential mortgage loans.

“Mortgage-lending process” means the process through which a person seeks or obtains a mortgage loan, including, but not limited to, solicitation, application, origination, negotiation of terms, third-party provider services, underwriting, signing and closing, and funding of the loan. Documents involved in the mortgage-lending process include, but are not limited to, uniform residential loan applications or other loan applications, appraisal reports, HUD-1 Settlement Statements, supporting personal documentation for loan applications such as W-2 forms, verifications of income and employment, bank statements, tax returns, payroll stubs and any required disclosures.

“Mortgage loan originator” means an individual who:

Takes a residential mortgage loan application; and

Offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan for compensation or gain. The term “mortgage loan originator” does not include:

1. An individual engaged solely as a loan processor or underwriter except as otherwise provided in this chapter;

2. A person or entity that only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or registered in accordance with Mississippi law, unless the person or entity is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator; and

3. A person or entity solely involved in extensions of credit relating to time-share plans, as that term is defined in Title 11 USCS, Section 101(53D).

“Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry” means a mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of licensed mortgage loan originators.

“Natural person” means a human being, as distinguished from an artificial person created by law.

“Nontraditional mortgage product” means any mortgage product other than a thirty-year fixed rate mortgage.

“Offering or negotiating a residential mortgage loan” means:

Presenting particular mortgage loan terms for consideration by a borrower; or

Communicating directly or indirectly with a borrower for purposes of reaching a mutual understanding about prospective loan terms.

“Offering or negotiating” does not include the following: the mere sharing of general information about a financing source; discussing hypothetical financing options, i.e., options not related to specific financing source; giving the homebuyer a list of available financing sources; discussing a buyer’s ability to afford a home; presenting or discussing generic facts or generic rate sheets; closing personal property transactions.

“Person” means a natural person, sole proprietorship, corporation, company, limited liability company, partnership or association.

“Principal” means a person who, directly or indirectly, owns or controls an ownership interest of ten percent (10%) or more in a corporation or any other form of business organization, regardless of whether the person owns or controls the ownership interest through one or more persons or one or more proxies, powers of attorney, nominees, corporations, associations, limited liability companies, partnerships, trusts, joint-stock companies, other entities or devises, or any combination thereof.

“Qualifying individual” means an owner or employee of a mortgage broker or mortgage lender who submits documentation of two (2) years’ experience directly related to mortgage activities and who shall be primarily responsible for the operations of the licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender. This individual will also be designated as the qualifying individual in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

“Real estate brokerage activity” means any activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including:

Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a buyer, seller, lessor or lessee of real property;

Bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase, lease, rental or exchange of real property;

Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental or exchange of real property (other than in connection with providing financing with respect to any such transaction);

Engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate agent or real estate broker under any applicable law; and

Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity, described in subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv) of this paragraph (gg).

“Records” or “documents” means any item in hard copy or produced in a format of storage commonly described as electronic, imaged, magnetic, microphotographic or otherwise, and any reproduction so made shall have the same force and effect as the original thereof and be admitted in evidence equally with the original.

“Registered mortgage loan originator” means any individual who:

Meets the definition of mortgage loan originator and is an employee of a depository institution, a subsidiary that is owned and controlled by a depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency or an institution regulated by the Farm Credit Administration; and

Is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

“Residential mortgage loan” means any loan primarily for personal, family or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling (as defined in Section 103(v) of the Truth in Lending Act) or residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling (as so defined).

“Residential real estate” means any real property located in Mississippi upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling.

“Service a mortgage loan” means the collection or remittance for another, the right to collect or remit for another, or the collection of the company’s own loan portfolio, whether or not the company originated, funded or purchased the loan in the secondary market, of payments of principal and interest, trust items such as insurance and taxes, and any other payments pursuant to a mortgage loan.

“Taking an application for a residential mortgage loan” means a receipt of an application for the purpose of deciding whether or not to extend the requested offer of a loan to the borrower whether the application is received directly or indirectly from the borrower. However, an individual whose only role with respect to the application is physically handling a completed application form or transmitting a completed form to a lender on behalf of a prospective borrower does not take an application.

“Unique identifier” means a class

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 499, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-5.
Exemptions [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

The following are exempt from the provisions of this chapter:

Registered mortgage loan originators, when acting for an entity described in Section 81-18-3(ii).

Any person who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member of the individual.

Any person, estate or trust who owner finances in one (1) calendar year no more than ten (10) residential mortgage loans or no more than twenty percent (20%) of his total residential units sold, whichever is greater. A violation of this paragraph (c) shall not affect the title of the purchaser/borrower or the obligation of the purchaser/borrower under the terms of the mortgage loan.

A licensed attorney who negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan on behalf of a client as an ancillary matter to the attorney’s representation of the client, unless the attorney is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of the lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator.

A depository institution, or a subsidiary that is owned and controlled by a depository institution, or an institution regulated by the Farm Credit Administration.

Any mortgage lender who holds a valid license under the provisions of the Small Loan Regulatory Law, Section 75-67-101 et seq., and the Small Loan Privilege Tax Law, Section 75-67-201 et seq., and whose mortgage lending activities are limited solely to the servicing of mortgage loans that were in such mortgage lender’s own loan portfolio as of December 31, 2009. For the purposes of the exemption in this paragraph (f), “servicing of mortgage loans” shall mean and include the collection of payments of principal and interest, insurance premiums, taxes and other payments required under such mortgage loans, and shall also include activities related to the collection of such payments such as collection calls whether by phone, mail, electronic means or in person, and enforcement remedies permitted by law or at equity. In no event shall the term “servicing of mortgage loans” include the renewal or reworking of the mortgage. If a mortgage loan is renewed or reworked, the lender shall be required to obtain a mortgage license in order to continue any mortgage activity described in this chapter.

Any bona fide nonprofit organization and its employees who demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commissioner through the periodic examination of the books and activities of the organization as required in Section 81-18-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, that they continually meet the following requirements, at a minimum:

Maintains tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

Promotes affordable housing or provides homeownership education, or similar services;

Conducts its activities in a manner that serves public or charitable purposes;

Receives funding and revenue and charges fees in a manner that does not incentivize the organization or its employees to act other than in the best interests of its clients;

Compensates employees in a manner that does not incentivize employees to act other than in the best interests of its client; and

Provides to or identifies for the borrower residential mortgage loans with terms that are favorable to the borrower and comparable to mortgage loans and housing assistance provided under government housing assistance programs.

Any person who is an employee of a government agency or housing finance agency who acts as a mortgage loan originator in accordance with his duties as an employee of such agency.

Any person who performs clerical or support duties at the direction of and subject to the supervision and instruction of a state-licensed loan originator or a registered loan originator. For purposes of this paragraph (i), the term “clerical or support duties” may include:

The receipt, collection, distribution and analysis of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan; and

Communicating with a consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a loan, to the extent that such communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms, or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 3; Laws, 2008, ch. 434, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 428, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2013, ch. 421, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-7.
Mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage loan originator licensing requirement; violations [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

No person shall transact business in this state, directly or indirectly, as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender unless he or she is licensed by the department or is a person exempted from the licensing requirements under Section 81-18-5.

A violation of this section does not affect the obligation of the borrower under the terms of the mortgage loan. The department shall publish and provide for distribution of information regarding approved or revoked licenses.

Every person who directly or indirectly controls a person who violates this section, including a general partner, executive officer, joint venturer, contractor, or director of the person, violates this section to the same extent as the person, unless the person whose violation arises under this subsection shows by a preponderance of evidence the burden of proof that he or she did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the existence of the facts by reason of which the original violation is alleged to exist.

An individual, unless specifically exempted from this chapter under Section 81-18-5, shall not engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator with respect to any dwelling located in this state without first obtaining and maintaining annually a license under this chapter. Each licensed mortgage loan originator must register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

In order to facilitate an orderly transition to licensing and minimize disruption in the mortgage marketplace, the effective date of subsection (4) of this section shall be as follows:

For all individuals other than individuals described in paragraph (b), the effective date shall be July 31, 2010, or such later date approved by the Secretary of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, under the authority granted under Public Law 110-289, Section 1508(a).

For all individuals licensed as mortgage loan originators as of July 31, 2009, the effective date shall be January 1, 2011, or such later date approved by the Secretary of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, under the authority granted under Public Law 110-289, Section 1508(a).

For the purposes of implementing an orderly and efficient licensing process, the commissioner may establish licensing rules or regulations and interim procedures for licensing and acceptance of applications. For previously registered or licensed individuals, the commissioner may establish expedited review and licensing procedures.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-8.
Enactment of local ordinances and regulations in compliance with this chapter authorized [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Municipalities and counties in this state may enact ordinances that are in compliance with, but not more restrictive than, the provisions of this chapter. Any order, ordinance or regulation existing on July 1, 2002, or enacted on or after July 1, 2002, that conflicts with this provision shall be null and void.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-9.
Application for license [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Applicants for a license shall apply in a form as prescribed by the commissioner. Each such form shall contain content as set forth by rule, regulation, instruction or procedure of the commissioner and may be changed or updated as necessary by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The mortgage broker and mortgage lender application through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

The legal name, residence and business address of the applicant and, if applicable, the legal name, residence and business address of every principal and executive officer, together with the résumé of the applicant and of every principal and executive officer of the applicant. In addition, an independent credit report obtained from a consumer-reporting agency described in Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act and information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction of every principal and executive officer.

The legal name of the mortgage broker or mortgage lender in addition to the name under which the applicant will conduct business in the state, neither of which may be already assigned to a licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender.

The complete address of the applicant’s principal place of business, branch office(s) and any other locations at which the applicant will engage in any business activity covered by this chapter. All locations shall be within the United States of America or a territory of the United States of America, including Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands.

A copy of the certificate of incorporation, if a Mississippi corporation.

Documentation satisfactory to the department as to a certificate of existence of authority to transact business lawfully in Mississippi from the Mississippi Secretary of State’s office, if a limited liability company, partnership, trust or any other group of persons, however organized. This paragraph does not pertain to applicants organized as an individual or as a sole proprietorship.

If a foreign entity, a copy of a certificate of authority to conduct business in Mississippi and the address of the principal place of business of the foreign entity.

Documentation of a minimum of two (2) years’ experience directly related to mortgage activities by a person named as the qualifying individual of the company. The qualifying individual shall be primarily responsible for the operations of the licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender. Only one (1) qualifying individual shall be named for Mississippi and this person shall be the qualifying individual for only one (1) licensee. Evidence of experience shall include, where applicable:

Copies of business licenses issued by governmental agencies.

Employment history of the person filing the application for at least two (2) years before the date of the filing of an application, including, but not limited to, job descriptions, length of employment, names, addresses and phone numbers for past employers.

Any other data and pertinent information as the department may require with respect to the applicant, its directors, principals, trustees, officers, members, contractors or agents. A résumé alone shall not be sufficient proof of employment history.

The mortgage broker and mortgage lender applications shall be filed on the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry together with the following:

The license fee specified in Section 81-18-15;

An original or certified copy of a surety bond in favor of the State of Mississippi for the use, benefit and indemnity of any person who suffers any damage or loss as a result of the company’s breach of contract or of any obligation arising therefrom or any violation of law;

A set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency from the following applicants:

All persons operating as a sole proprietorship that plan to conduct a mortgage-brokering or lending business in the State of Mississippi;

Partners in a partnership or principal owners of a limited liability company that own at least ten percent (10%) of the voting shares of the company;

Any shareholders owning ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of the corporation;

All executive officers of the applicant;

All loan originators; and

The named qualifying individual of the company as required in Section 81-18-9(2) (g). The applicant shall name only one (1) individual as the qualifying individual for the State of Mississippi; and

At least one (1) employee shall be licensed as a loan originator at a licensed location.

In connection with an application for licensing as a mortgage broker or lender under this chapter, the required stockholders, owners, directors and executive officers of the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry information concerning the individual’s identity, including:

Fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and any governmental entity authorized to receive that information for a state, national and/or international criminal history background check; and

Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, including the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and the commissioner to obtain:

An independent credit report obtained from a consumer-reporting agency described in Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act; and

Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

Upon receipt of an application for licensure, the department or designated third party shall conduct an investigation as it deems necessary to determine that the applicant and its officers, directors and principals are of good character and ethical reputation; that the applicant demonstrates reasonable financial responsibility; and that the applicant has reasonable policies and procedures to receive and process customer grievances and inquiries promptly and fairly.

The commissioner shall not license an applicant unless he is satisfied that the applicant will operate its mortgage activities in compliance with the laws, rules and regulations of this state and the United States.

If an applicant satisfies the requirements of this chapter for a mortgage broker or mortgage lender license, the commissioner shall issue the license unless the commissioner finds any of the following:

The applicant has had a mortgage lender, mortgage broker or mortgage servicer license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of the revocation shall not be deemed a revocation; or

The applicant or its controlling persons has been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, (i) a felony in a domestic, foreign or military court during the seven-year period preceding the date of application for licensing; or (ii) at any time preceding the date of application if such felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, a breach of trust, or money laundering. However, any pardon or expungement of a conviction shall not be a conviction for purposes of this subsection.

Applicants for a mortgage loan originator license shall apply in a form as prescribed by the commissioner and shall be filed on the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. Each such form shall contain content as set forth by rules, regulations, instructions or procedures of the commissioner and may be changed or updated as necessary by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The initial license of a mortgage loan originator shall be accompanied by a fee of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), to be paid to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, and any additional fees as required by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. The commissioner shall not issue a mortgage loan originator license unless the commissioner makes at a minimum the following findings:

The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a later formal vacation of that revocation shall not be deemed a revocation.

The applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, (i) a felony in a domestic, foreign or military court during the seven-year period preceding the date of application for licensing; or (ii) at any time preceding the date of application if such felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, a breach of trust or money laundering. However, any pardon or expungement of a conviction shall not be a conviction for purposes of this subsection.

The applicant has demonstrated financial responsibility, character and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly and efficiently within the purposes of this chapter.

The applicant has completed the prelicensing education requirement described in Section 81-18-14(1).

The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in Section 81-18-14(7).

The applicant has met the surety bond requirement as provided in Section 81-18-11.

This individual must work for a Mississippi licensed company and work from the location licensed with the department. The licensed location that he or she is assigned to must be within one hundred twenty-five (125) miles of his or her residency. If the licensed loan originator resides and works in Mississippi, then he or she may work from any licensed location of the licensed company within the State of Mississippi. However, an owner of a minimum of ten percent (10%) of a licensed company or the named qualifying individual on file with the department, who is a licensed loan originator with the department, may work from any licensed location of the licensed company within the State of Mississippi in the capacity of a loan originator as described in this chapter.

In order to fulfill the purposes of this chapter, the commissioner is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this chapter.

In connection with an application for licensing as a mortgage loan originator, the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry information concerning the applicant’s identity, including:

Fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive that information for a state, national and/or international criminal history background check; and

Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, including the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and the commissioner to obtain:

An independent credit report obtained from a consumer-reporting agency described in Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act; and

Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the Federal Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (10)(a) and (b)(ii) of this section, the commissioner may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the Department of Justice or any governmental agency.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the commissioner may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (10)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section, the commissioner may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 5; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 6; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 6; Laws, 2008, ch. 434, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 5; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 6; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 5; Laws, 2013, ch. 499, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-11.
Mortgage loan originator surety bond requirement; form; amount [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Each mortgage loan originator shall be covered by a surety bond in accordance with this section. If the mortgage loan originator is an employee or exclusive agent of a person subject to this chapter, the surety bond of the person who is subject to this chapter may be used in lieu of the mortgage loan originator’s surety bond requirement.

The surety bond shall be in a form as prescribed by the commissioner, and shall provide coverage for each mortgage loan originator in an amount as prescribed in subsection (3) of this section.

The penal sum of the surety bond shall be maintained in an amount as determined by the commissioner by rule or regulation and shall be based upon loan activity during the previous year, but shall not exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for a mortgage broker or One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) for a mortgage lender. For an initial applicant, the bond amount shall be set at Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for a mortgage broker and One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) for a mortgage lender.

When an action is commenced on a licensee’s bond, the commissioner may require the filing of a new bond. Immediately upon recovery upon any action on the bond, the licensee shall file a new bond.

All surety bonds shall be in favor, first, of the State of Mississippi for the use, benefit and indemnity of any person who suffers any damage or loss as a result of the company’s breach of contract or of any obligation arising from the contract or any violation of law, and, second, for the payment of any civil penalties, criminal fines, or costs of investigation and/or prosecution incurred by the State of Mississippi, including local law enforcement agencies.

The commissioner may promulgate rules or regulations with respect to the requirements for the surety bonds as are necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 7; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 7; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 7; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2016.